Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 3

Sales and Leases by Municipalities to and from Not-for-Profit Corporations

12-2-301. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise clearly requires:

“Governing body” includes all bodies and boards, by whatsoever names they may be known, charged with the governing of a municipality;

“Municipality” includes any county, city or town of the state;

“Not-for-profit corporation” means a general welfare corporation organized under § 48-1101(15) [repealed] as it existed prior to July 1, 1969, or a corporation, not-for-profit, organized under title 48 for the acquisition, construction, equipment and furnishing of buildings, structures, facilities and permanent improvements of all descriptions for lease, subdivision or conveyance to counties, cities and towns of the state; and

“Project” means and includes any building, structure, facility or permanent improvement, including the necessary equipment and furnishings therefor, which a municipality proceeding under this part is authorized to own, use or operate under any other provision of law.

Acts 1965, ch. 328, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1968, ch. 523, § 1 (17.06); T.C.A., § 12-229.

Compiler's Notes. Subdivision (15) of § 48-1101, as it existed prior to its repeal by Acts 1968, ch. 523, § 1 (17.02), read:

“(15) The acquisition, construction, equipment and furnishing of buildings, structures, facilities and permanent improvements of all descriptions for lease, subdivision or conveyance to counties, cities and towns of the state. Any corporation organized for the purposes of this subdivision (15) is hereby declared to be performing a public function in behalf of the county, city or town with respect to which it is providing buildings, structures, facilities or permanent improvements and to be a public instrumentality for such purposes. Accordingly, the corporation and all properties and any interest therein at any time owned by it and leased or conveyed to a county, city or town and the income therefrom and all bonds or other obligations issued by it and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the state except those taxes imposed by title 67, ch. 30 of this Code. Also, for purposes of the Securities Law of 1955, compiled as § 48-1601 et seq., and any amendment thereto or in subject petition therefor, bonds and other obligations issued by such a corporation shall be deemed to be securities issued by a public instrumentality of the state.”

The not-for-profit corporation provisions in title 48, ch. 1, parts 1-14 were repealed as of January 1, 1988. As of that date, title 48, chs. 51-68 contain the provisions relating to not-for-profit corporations.

Attorney General Opinions. Pledge of city appropriations to nonprofit organization, OAG 99-225, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 231 (12/3/99).

12-2-302. Powers and duties of municipality.

In order to provide projects for a municipality and to enable the construction and financing thereof on lands owned by the municipality or by a not-for-profit corporation, but for no other purpose unless authorized by law, a municipality has the following powers and duties:

Without limitation by reason of any other provisions of law, the power to sell and convey title to a not-for-profit corporation any land and any existing building thereon owned by the municipality for such consideration and upon such terms and conditions as in the judgment of the governing body are in the interests of the municipality;

Without limitation by reason of any other provisions of law, the power to lease to a not-for-profit corporation for a term or terms, not exceeding fifty (50) years each, any land and existing buildings thereon owned by the municipality upon such terms and conditions as in the judgment of the governing body are in the interests of the municipality;

The power to lease or sublease from a not-for-profit corporation and to make available for public use any project erected upon land conveyed or leased to a not-for-profit corporation or upon any of the land owned by a not-for-profit corporation upon such terms, conditions and rentals as in the judgment of the governing body are in the interests of the municipality;

The power to pledge and assign all or any part of the revenues derived from the operation of a project as security for the payment of rentals due and to become due under any lease or sublease under subdivision (3);

The power to covenant and agree in any lease or sublease made under subdivision (3) to impose fees, rentals or other charges for the use and occupancy or other operation of such project in an amount calculated to produce net revenues sufficient to pay the rentals due and to become due under such lease or sublease; and

The power and duty, upon receipt of notice of any assignment by any such not-for-profit corporation of any lease or sublease made under subdivision (3), or of any of its rights under any such lease or sublease, to recognize and give effect to such assignment, and to pay to the assignee thereof rentals and other payments then due or which may become due under any such lease or sublease which has been so assigned by such not-for-profit corporation.

Acts 1965, ch. 328, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1968, ch. 523, § 1 (17.06); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-230.

12-2-303. Municipality's liability under lease — Actions by not-for-profit corporations as lessors.

The municipality shall be liable for accrued rentals and for any other default under any lease or sublease made under §12-2-302(3), and may be sued therefor on contract as in other contract actions, except that it shall not be necessary for the not-for-profit corporation, as lessor, under any such lease or sublease or any assignee of such lessor or any person or legal entity proceeding on behalf of such lessor to file any claim or take any other action or proceeding prior to the commencement of any such action.

Acts 1965, ch. 328, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1968, ch. 523, § 1 (17.06); T.C.A., § 12-231.

12-2-304. Municipality's obligations not within debt limitations.

The obligations assumed and undertaken by a municipality pursuant to a lease or sublease made under §12-2-302(3), including any unconditional or other obligation to pay rentals for a fixed term or terms, shall not be deemed or construed as constituting a debt of the municipality within the terms, provisions or limitations of any constitutional, statutory, charter or other limitations.

Acts 1965, ch. 328, § 4; T.C.A., § 12-232.

12-2-305. Provision in lease to convey title upon retirement of obligations.

Every lease and sublease made by a municipality with a not-for-profit corporation under §12-2-302(3) shall include a provision requiring such not-for-profit corporation to transfer and convey all of its right, title and interest in and to the project covered thereby immediately upon the payment and retirement of all bonds and other obligations issued by such not-for-profit corporation for the purpose of financing the cost of such project.

Acts 1965, ch. 328, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1968, ch. 523, § 1 (17.06); T.C.A., § 12-233.

12-2-306. Powers conferred supplementary to other powers — Limitations do not restrict powers granted by other laws.

The powers conferred by this part shall be in addition and supplementary to and the limitations by such sections shall not affect the powers conferred by any other general, special or local law. Projects may be undertaken under this part, notwithstanding that any other general, special or local law may provide for the acquisition, construction or lease of projects by municipalities, and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitations or other provisions contained in any other general, special or local law.

Acts 1965, ch. 328, § 6; T.C.A., § 12-234.